Utah statutes.
67-19-26.   Severability of provisions -- Compliance with requirements for federally aided programs.

(1)  If any provision of this chapter or of any regulation or order issued thereunder or the application of any provision of this chapter to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of this chapter and the application of provision of this chapter or regulation or orders issued under it to persons or circumstances other than those to which it is held invalid shall still be regarded as having the force and effect of law.

(2)  If any part of this chapter is found to be in conflict with federal requirements which are a condition precedent to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this chapter shall be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and such findings shall not affect the operation of the remainder of this chapter in its application to the agencies concerned.

(3)  Notwithstanding any provisions in this chapter to the contrary, no regulation shall be adopted which would deprive the state or any of its departments or institutions of federal grants or other forms of financial assistance, and the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder shall include standards, provisions, terms, and conditions for personnel engaged in the administration of federally aided programs, which shall, in all respects, comply with the necessary requirements for a qualified human resource system under the standards applicable to personnel engaged in the administration of federally aided programs.

